Illinois, session 104th, SB1875.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Methamphetamine Precursor Control Act is 5amended by changing Section 25 as follows: 6    (720 ILCS 648/25)7    Sec. 25. Pharmacies. 8    (a) No targeted methamphetamine precursor may be knowingly 9distributed through a pharmacy, including a pharmacy located 10within, owned by, operated by, or associated with a retail 11distributor unless all terms of this Section are satisfied.12    (b) Any targeted methamphetamine precursor other than a 13convenience package or a liquid, including but not limited to 14any targeted methamphetamine precursor in liquid-filled 15capsules, shall: be packaged in blister packs, with each 16blister containing not more than 2 dosage units, or when the 17use of blister packs is technically infeasible, in unit dose 18packets. Each targeted package shall contain no more than 193,600 3,000 milligrams of ephedrine or pseudoephedrine, their 20salts or optical isomers, or salts of optical isomers. 21    (c) The targeted methamphetamine precursor shall be stored 22behind the pharmacy counter and distributed by a pharmacist or 23pharmacy technician licensed under the Pharmacy Practice Act,   SB1875- 2 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1or by an agent of the pharmacist or pharmacy technician.2    (d) Any retail distributor operating a pharmacy, and any 3pharmacist or pharmacy technician involved in the transaction 4or transactions, shall ensure that any person purchasing, 5receiving, or otherwise acquiring the targeted methamphetamine 6precursor complies with subsection (a) of Section 20 of this 7Act. 8    (e) Any retail distributor operating a pharmacy, and any 9pharmacist or pharmacy technician involved in the transaction 10or transactions, shall verify that:11        (1) The person purchasing, receiving, or otherwise 12    acquiring the targeted methamphetamine precursor is 18 13    years of age or older and resembles the photograph of the 14    person on the government-issued identification presented 15    by the person; and 16        (2) The name entered into the log referred to in 17    subsection (a) of Section 20 of this Act corresponds to 18    the name on the government-issued identification presented 19    by the person. 20    (f) The logs referred to in subsection (a) of Section 20 of 21this Act shall be kept confidential, maintained for not less 22than 4 years, and made available for inspection and copying by 23any law enforcement officer upon request of that officer. 24These logs shall be kept in an electronic format as required by 25the Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act.26    (g) No retail distributor operating a pharmacy, and no   SB1875- 3 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1pharmacist or pharmacy technician, shall knowingly distribute 2any targeted methamphetamine precursor to any person under 18 3years of age.4    (h) (Blank). No retail distributor operating a pharmacy, 5and no pharmacist or pharmacy technician, shall knowingly 6distribute to a single person more than 2 targeted packages in 7a single retail transaction.8    (i) No retail distributor operating a pharmacy, and no 9pharmacist or pharmacy technician, shall knowingly distribute 10to a single person in any 30-day period products containing 11more than a total of 7,500 milligrams of ephedrine or 12pseudoephedrine, their salts or optical isomers, or salts of 13optical isomers. 14    (j) A pharmacist or pharmacy technician may distribute a 15targeted methamphetamine precursor to a person who is without 16a form of identification specified in paragraph (1) of 17subsection (a) of Section 20 of this Act only if all other 18provisions of this Act are followed and either:19        (1) the person presents a driver's license issued 20    without a photograph by the State of Illinois pursuant to 21    the Illinois Administrative Code, Title 92, Section 22    1030.90(b)(1) or 1030.90(b)(2); or23        (2) the person is known to the pharmacist or pharmacy 24    technician, the person presents some form of 25    identification, and the pharmacist or pharmacy technician 26    reasonably believes that the targeted methamphetamine   SB1875- 4 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1    precursor will be used for a legitimate medical purpose 2    and not to manufacture methamphetamine. 3    (k) When a pharmacist or pharmacy technician distributes a 4targeted methamphetamine precursor to a person according to 5the procedures set forth in this Act, and the pharmacist or 6pharmacy technician does not have access to a working cash 7register at the pharmacy counter, the pharmacist or pharmacy 8technician may instruct the person to pay for the targeted 9methamphetamine precursor at a cash register located elsewhere 10in the retail establishment, whether that register is operated 11by a pharmacist, pharmacy technician, or other employee or 12agent of the retail establishment. 13(Source: P.A. 96-50, eff. 10-21-09; 97-670, eff. 1-19-12.) 14    Section 10. The Methamphetamine Precursor Tracking Act is 15amended by changing Sections 15 and 30 as follows: 16    (720 ILCS 649/15)17    Sec. 15. General provisions. 18    (a) Structure. There is established a statewide precursor 19tracking program coordinated and administered by the Illinois 20State Police to track purchases of targeted methamphetamine 21precursors across multiple locations for the purposes stated 22in Section 5 of this Act. Every covered pharmacy must comply 23with this Act. The tracking program created by this Act shall 24be the sole methamphetamine precursor tracking program in   SB1875- 5 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1Illinois. 2    (b) Transmission of electronic transaction records. Unless 3otherwise provided in this Act, each time a covered pharmacy 4distributes a targeted methamphetamine precursor to a 5recipient, the pharmacy shall transmit an electronic 6transaction record to the Central Repository. 7    (c) Notification. The Illinois Department of Financial and 8Professional Regulation shall notify pharmacies seeking 9licensure in Illinois of their obligation to comply with the 10requirements of this Act. 11    (d) Electronic transmission. Starting on the effective 12date of this Act and continuing thereafter, covered pharmacies 13shall transmit all electronic transaction records as required 14by this Act. 15    (e) Funding. 16        (1) On and after October 1, 2025, any manufacturer of 17    products containing methamphetamine precursors sold in or 18    brought into this State must, on a monthly basis, pay fees 19    to the Central Repository.20        (2) The Central Repository shall be responsible for 21    setting the fee levels required under paragraph (1).22        (3) At the request of the Illinois State Police, 23    manufacturers required to pay fees under paragraph (1) 24    shall be required to provide written documentation 25    demonstrating that they have paid such fees.26        (4) The sale of methamphetamine precursors in or   SB1875- 6 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1    brought into this State by a manufacturer who has failed 2    to pay fees required under paragraph (1) shall be 3    considered a violation of this Section and shall subject 4    the manufacturer to the penalties outlined in subsection 5    (c) of Section 30.6        (5) Funding for the tracking program shall be provided 7    by the Illinois State Police drawing upon federal and 8    State grant money and other available sources. 9(Source: P.A. 97-670, eff. 1-19-12.) 10    (720 ILCS 649/30)11    Sec. 30. Violations. 12    (a) Any covered pharmacy or retail distributor that 13violates this Act is guilty of a petty offense and subject to a 14fine of $500 for a first offense; $1,000 for a second offense 15occurring at the same retail location as and within 3 years of 16the offense; and $5,000 for a third or subsequent offense 17occurring at the same retail location as and within 3 years of 18the prior offenses.19    (b) An employee or agent of a covered pharmacy who 20violates this Act is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor for a 21first offense; a Class 4 felony for a second offense; and a 22Class 1 felony for a third or subsequent offense. 23    (c) Any manufacturer that violates subsection (e) of 24Section 15 of this Act is guilty of a petty offense and subject 25to a fine of $500 for a first offense; $1,000 for a second   SB1875- 7 -LRB104 09441 RLC 19501 b1offense occurring within 3 years of the first offense; and 2$5,000 for a third or subsequent offense occurring within 3 3years of the prior offenses. 4(Source: P.A. 97-670, eff. 1-19-12.) 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.